District of Columbia statutes.
46-410

Issuance of license — Duty of Clerk; false swearing by applicant deemed perjury.

It shall be the duty of the Clerk of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia before issuing any license to solemnize a marriage to examine any applicant for said license under oath and to ascertain the names and ages of the parties desiring to marry, and if they are under age the names of their parents or guardians, whether they were previously married, whether they are related or not, and if so, in what degree, which facts shall appear on the face of the application, of which the Clerk shall provide a printed form, and any false swearing in regard to such matters shall be deemed perjury.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1392, ch. 854, § 1291
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 5, 1966, 80 Stat. 264, Pub. L. 89-493, § 13(a)
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
Apr. 7, 1977, D.C. Law 1-107, title I, § 113(a), 23 DCR 8737

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-110.
1973 Ed., § 30-110.